Connecticut, session 2026, HB05583.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Transportation shall convey
to the Connecticut Municipal Development Authority parcels of land
located in the town of Derby, at a cost equal to the fair market value of
the property, as determined by the average of the appraisals of two
independent appraisers selected by the commissioner, plus the
administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcels of land
have an area of approximately 1.5 acres and are identified as Lots 178,
181, 182, 183, 184, 185, 190, 191, 193 and 211 on town of Derby Tax
Assessor's Map 8-5 and Lot 7 on town of Derby Tax Assessor's Map 8-3.
The precise size and area of the parcels to be conveyed shall be
determined by the Commissioner of Transportation. The conveyance
shall be subject to the approval of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcels of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Transportation.
The land shall remain under the care and control of said department
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this

House Bill No. 5583
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section. The
Commissioner of Transportation shall have the sole responsibility for all
other incidents of such conveyance. Any funds received by the
Department of Transportation from a sale of said parcels in accordance
with this section shall be transferred to the Treasurer for deposit in the
Special Transportation Fund.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-32 2 of 2